Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.150

Interchange of personnel between federal and state agencies—Agreements—Provisions.

A state agency may enter into agreements with departments or other subdivisions of the federal government for the interchange of personnel on projects which are of mutual benefit to the state and federal government.

An interchange agreement shall specify the fiscal arrangements to be made, including compensations, rights, benefits and obligations of the employees concerned, travel and transportation of employees, their immediate families and household goods, and the duties and supervision of employees while on assignment.

[ 1959 c 102 s 2.]